Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 10 Support of Parents

15-10-1.
Penalty for unreasonable neglect of destitute parents.

Any person, above the age of eighteen (18) years, who unreasonably neglects or refuses to provide for the support and maintenance of his or her parent, whether father or mother, residing in this state, when his or her parent through misfortune, and without fault of his or her own, is destitute of means of sustenance and unable by reason of old age, infirmity, or illness to support and maintain himself or herself, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200), or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both a fine and imprisonment.

No neglect or refusal shall be deemed unreasonable as to a child who, during his or her minority, was not reasonably supported by the parent, if the parent was charged with the duty to do so, nor as to any child who, being one of two (2) or more children, has made proper and reasonable contribution toward the support of his or her destitute parent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1510, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 292, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 419, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-10-1

; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 26.

15-10-2.
Orders for benefit of parents.

Before the trial, with the consent of the defendant, or at the trial, on entry of a plea of guilty, or after conviction, the court may, in its discretion, make any orders and require any conditions for the benefit of the destitute parent that the circumstances of the defendant may require.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1510, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 292, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 419, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

15-10-2

.

15-10-3.
Director of human services as complainant.

The director of human services or any person designated and appointed to do so by the director may be the party complainant to any complaint and warrant brought to invoke the penalties provided for in this chapter, and the director or his or her designee and appointee shall be exempt from giving surety for costs in any such action.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2984, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-10-3

; P.L. 1959, ch. 93, § 2; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

15-10-4.
Other parties as complainants — Jurisdiction and venue.

Complaints under the provisions of this chapter may be made by a destitute parent, children of a destitute parent, the director of public welfare of any city or town, or the director of any licensed private charity, in the district court of the judicial district, or police court of the city, or the family court of the area, in which either the parent or child is living.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1510, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 292, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 419, § 3; P.L. 1954, ch. 3383, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-10-4

.

15-10-5.
Costs paid by state.

Whenever a complaint under this chapter shall be brought by a director of public welfare, the costs, if taxed to the complainant, shall be paid by the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1510, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 292, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 419, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

15-10-5

.

15-10-6.
Prosecution of criminal actions.

All criminal actions for any violation of this chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated under this chapter pertaining to the department of human services shall be prosecuted by the attorney general or by any qualified member of the Rhode Island bar who shall be designated by the director and approved by the attorney general to institute and prosecute the action.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2984, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

15-10-6

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

15-10-7.
Right of contribution from other children.

Any child making more than his or her share of a proper and reasonable contribution toward the support of his or her destitute parents shall have a right of contribution from other children over the age of eighteen (18) years of the parents, who have been supported by the parents, in a civil action subject to any orders and conditions that the court deems that the circumstances of the defendant or defendants may require.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 419, § 5; P.L. 1954, ch. 3383, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

15-10-7

.

15-10-8.
Support for certain patients of nursing facilities.

The uncompensated costs of care provided by a licensed nursing facility to any person may be recovered by the nursing facility from any child of that person who is above the age of eighteen (18) years, to the extent that the child previously received a transfer of any interests or assets from the person receiving such care, which transfer resulted in a period of Medicaid ineligibility imposed pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1396p(c), as amended from time to time, on a person whose assets have been transferred for less than fair market value.

Recourse hereunder shall be limited to the fair market value of the interests or assets transferred at the time of transfer. For the purposes of this section “the costs of care” shall mean the costs of providing care, including nursing care, personal care, meals, transportation and any other costs, charges, and expenses incurred by the facility. Costs of care shall not exceed the customary rate the nursing facility charges to a patient who pays for his or her care directly rather than through a governmental or other third party payor. Nothing contained in this section shall prohibit or otherwise diminish any other causes of action possessed by any such nursing facility. The death of the person receiving nursing facility care shall not nullify or otherwise affect the liability of the person or persons charged with the costs of care hereunder.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 1.